trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="å__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fe__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="go__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="putt/o__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="okulage__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="him/mel__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>mel</l>       <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>melen</l>     <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>meln</l>      <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lar</l>       <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>larna</l>     <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tonår__n_p">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="trim__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="n__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="öre__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="stadi/on__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="patron__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="peso__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ock/er__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="tornado">         <i>tornado</i><par n="peso__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hekto">           <i>hekto</i><par n="öre__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kolli">           <i>kolli</i><par n="öre__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="collie">          <i>collie</i><par n="peso__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tonår">           <i>tonår</i><par n="tonår__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="solglasögon">     <i>solglasögon</i><par n="tonår__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="putto">           <i>putt</i><par n="putt/o__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="omega">           <i>omega</i><par n="öre__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="crepe">           <i>crepe</i><par n="peso__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gaucho">          <i>gaucho</i><par n="peso__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hörglasögon">     <i>hörglasögon</i><par n="tonår__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="öre">             <i>öre</i><par n="öre__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="läsglasögon">     <i>läsglasögon</i><par n="tonår__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="gåsögon">         <i>gåsögon</i><par n="tonår__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="silo">            <i>silo</i><par n="peso__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="genitalorgan">    <i>genitalorgan</i><par n="tonår__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="poncho">          <i>poncho</i><par n="peso__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="å">               <i>å</i><par n="å__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ä">               <i>ä</i><par n="å__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="glasögon">        <i>glasögon</i><par n="tonår__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="abc">             <i>abc</i><par n="å__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="n">               <i>n</i><par n="n__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kilo">            <i>kilo</i><par n="öre__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kimono">          <i>kimono</i><par n="peso__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ordalag">         <i>ordalag</i><par n="tonår__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="pipeline">        <i>pipeline</i><par n="peso__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ungdomsfängelse"> <i>ungdomsfängelse</i><par n="okulage__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="täckelse">        <i>täckelse</i><par n="okulage__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="spökelse">        <i>spökelse</i><par n="okulage__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fängelse">        <i>fängelse</i><par n="okulage__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="okulage">         <i>okulage</i><par n="okulage__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kvinnofängelse">  <i>kvinnofängelse</i><par n="okulage__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="cellfängelse">    <i>cellfängelse</i><par n="okulage__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kymation">        <i>kymati</i><par n="stadi/on__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="busschaufför">    <i>busschaufför</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="major">           <i>major</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lungemboli">      <i>lungemboli</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="konstindustri">   <i>konstindustri</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="takykardi">       <i>takykardi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="glossolali">      <i>glossolali</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="filisté">         <i>filisté</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="maskopi">         <i>maskopi</i><par n="fe__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stadion">         <i>stadi</i><par n="stadi/on__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="patron">          <i>patron</i><par n="patron__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="takhimmel">       <i>takhim</i><par n="him/mel__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vinterhimmel">    <i>vinterhim</i><par n="him/mel__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tronhimmel">      <i>tronhim</i><par n="him/mel__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="himmel">          <i>him</i><par n="him/mel__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sänghimmel">      <i>sänghim</i><par n="him/mel__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="natthimmel">      <i>natthim</i><par n="him/mel__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stjärnhimmel">    <i>stjärnhim</i><par n="him/mel__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kräm">            <i>kräm</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kyrksilver">      <i>kyrksilv</i><par n="ock/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="pentylpulver">    <i>pentylpulv</i><par n="ock/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ramadan">         <i>ramadan</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="smorläder">       <i>smorläd</i><par n="ock/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ringside">        <i>ringside</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="strösocker">      <i>strösock</i><par n="ock/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="beige">           <i>beige</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="klander">         <i>kland</i><par n="ock/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="go">              <i>go</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="salicylsyrepulver"><i>salicylsyrepulv</i><par n="ock/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="skäkt">           <i>skäkt</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="trim">            <i>trim</i><par n="trim__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="ostan">           <i>ostan</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bröstsocker">     <i>bröstsock</i><par n="ock/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sternum">         <i>sternum</i><par n="go__n_ut"/></e>
